Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-657
Safety zone, defined.

Safety zone shall mean an area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as such area.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 153.